tests/ky-causpass.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../kir.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kir.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Regular causative -{T}{I}р":
    бол<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : болдуруу
    бас<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : бастыруу
    жак<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : жактыруу
    кач<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : качтыруу

  "[twol] Regular causative -т":
    эри<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : эритүү
    иште<v><iv><caus><past><p2><sg> : иштеткенсиң
    иште<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : иштетүү
    иште<v><iv><caus><ifi><p1><sg> : иштеттим
    токто<v><iv><caus><ifi><p1><sg> : токтоттум
    ачы<v><iv><caus><gpr_past> : ачыткан
    салкында<v><iv><caus><prc_perf>: салкындатып

  "[twol] Regular causative -т after consonants":
    өзгөр<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : өзгөртүп
    узар<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : узартып
    эскир<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : эскиртип
    кыскар<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : кыскартып
    айлан<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : айлантып
    айлан<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : айландырып
    улан<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : улантып
    улан<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : уландырып
    чогул<v><iv><caus><prc_perf> : чогултуп

  "[lexc] Irregular causatives":
    отур<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : отургузуу
    быш<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : бышыруу
    түш<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : түшүрүү
    бүт<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : бүтүрүү
    кет<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : кетирүү
    ак<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : агызуу
    чык<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : чыгаруу
    өч<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : өчүрүү
    кат<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : катыруу
    жет<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : жеткирүү
    #жет<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : жеткизүү
    өт<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : өткөрүү
    #өт<v><iv><caus><ger><nom> : өткөзүү

  "[twol] Passives":
    сез<v><tv><pass><ger><nom> : сезилүү
    жаз<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : жазылып
    көтөр<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : көтөрүлүп
    саба<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : сабалып

  "[twol] Passives with verb stem in л":
    мал<v><tv><pass><ger><nom> : малынуу
    жала<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : жаланып
    бомбала<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : бомбаланып
    тил<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : тилинип
    баала<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : бааланып


  "[twol] Short causatives":
    саа<v><tv><caus><prc_perf> : саадырып
    же<v><tv><caus><prc_perf> : жедирип
    жуу<v><tv><caus><prc_perf> : жуудуруп

  "[twol] pass.caus":
    жаз<v><tv><pass><caus><prc_perf> : жазылтып
    жаз<v><tv><pass><caus><prc_perf> : жазылдырып

  "[twol] caus.pass":
    кел<v><iv><caus><pass><prc_perf> : келтирилип
